Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Secretary of State shall  exercise the secretary’s authority under
ORS 171.130 (2)(c) to presession file a proposed legislative measure for consideration during
the 2027 regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) The  measure that the Secretary of State presession files pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section shall set  forth the recommendations of the secretary for changes to the sys-
tem of campaign finance limitations being implemented in this state and to reporting  re-
quirements related to these limitations. The  provisions of the measure shall reflect the
progress and experience in implementing chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 2.  If House Bill 4018 becomes law, section 1 of this 2026 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The Secretary of State  shall exercise the secretary’s authority under ORS 171.130
(2)(c) to presession file a proposed legislative measure for consideration during the 2027  regular
session of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) The measure that the Secretary of State presession files pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall set forth the recommendations of the secretary for changes to the system  of campaign
finance limitations being implemented in this state and to reporting requirements related  to these
limitations. The provisions  of the measure shall reflect the progress and experience in implementing
chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2024 , and chapter , Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4018) .
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1502 (SB 1502-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1502 (SB 1502-INTRO) Page 2